Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 2. Services, Rates, Charges, etc.

§ 56-234.
Duty to furnish adequate service at reasonable and uniform rates.

It shall be the duty of every public utility to furnish reasonably adequate service and facilities at reasonable and just rates to any person, firm or corporation along its lines desiring same. Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

A telephone company shall not have the duty to extend or expand its facilities to furnish service and facilities when the person, firm or corporation has service available from one or more alternative providers of wireline or terrestrial wireless communications
services at prevailing market rates; and

A telephone company may meet its duty to furnish reasonably adequate service and facilities through the use of any and all available wireline and terrestrial wireless technologies; however, a telephone company, when restoring service to an existing wireline
customer, shall offer the option to furnish service using wireline facilities.For purposes of subdivisions 1 and 2, the Commission shall have the authority upon request of an individual, corporation, or other entity, or
a telephone company, to determine whether the wireline or terrestrial wireless communications service available to the party requesting service is a reasonably adequate alternative to local exchange telephone service.The
use by a telephone company of wireline and terrestrial wireless technologies shall not be construed to grant any additional jurisdiction or authority to the Commission over such technologies.For purposes of subdivision
1, “prevailing market rates” means rates similar to those generally available to consumers in competitive areas for the same services.

It shall be the duty of every public utility to charge uniformly therefor all persons, corporations or municipal corporations using such service under like conditions. However, no provision of law shall be deemed to preclude voluntary rate or rate design
tests or experiments, or other experiments involving the use of special rates, where such experiments have been approved by order of the Commission after notice and hearing and a finding that such experiments are necessary in order
to acquire information which is or may be in furtherance of the public interest. The Commission’s final order regarding any petition filed by an investor-owned electric utility for approval of a voluntary rate or rate design test
or experiment shall be entered the earlier of not more than six months after the filing of the petition or not more than three months after the date of any evidentiary hearing concerning such petition. The charge for such service
shall be at the lowest rate applicable for such service in accordance with schedules filed with the Commission pursuant to § 56-236. But, subject to the provisions of § 56-232.1, nothing contained herein or in § 56-481.1 shall
apply to (i) schedules of rates for any telecommunications service provided to the public by virtue of any contract with, (ii) for any service provided under or relating to a contract for telecommunications services with, or (iii)
contracts for service rendered by any telephone company to, the state government or any agency thereof, or by any other public utility to any municipal corporation or to the state or federal government. The provisions hereof shall
not apply to or in any way affect any proceeding pending in the State Corporation Commission on or before July 1, 1950, and shall not confer on the Commission any jurisdiction not now vested in it with respect to any such proceeding.

The Commission may conclude that competition can effectively ensure reasonably adequate retail services in competitive exchanges and may carry out its duty to ensure that a public utility is furnishing reasonably adequate retail service in its competitive
exchanges by monitoring individual customer complaints and requiring appropriate responses to such complaints.

History.
Code 1919, § 4066; 1918, p. 675; 1924, p. 540; 1927, p. 125; 1950, p. 55; 1964, c. 195; 1970, c. 258; 1976, c. 290; 1985, cc. 2, 41; 2002, c. 833; 2011, cc. 738, 740; 2018, c. 296.

Cross references.

As to exemption of certain electrical cooperatives from the provisions of §§ 56-234 through 56-245, see § 56-231.50.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, c. 408, cl. 2, provides: “That public utilities in the Commonwealth shall (i) evaluate options to develop and offer off-peak charging rates or other incentives to encourage owners of an electric vehicle to charge or recharge its battery during
nonpeak times, when practical, and (ii) file copies of such evaluations with the State Corporation Commission. The State Corporation Commission shall make copies of the evaluations available to the public.”

Acts 2011, c. 408, cl. 3, provides: “That the State Corporation Commission (the Commission) shall, notwithstanding § 56-234 of the Code of Virginia, be authorized to approve, after notice to all affected parties and opportunity for hearing, pilot programs
conducted by public utilities, including programs offering special rates, contracts, or incentives to individual customers or classes of customers to determine the feasibility, and the implications for the public interest, of allowing
public electric utilities to offer time-differentiated rates to users of electric motor vehicles to encourage charging of vehicles during nonpeak periods. Elements of the pilot programs may include voluntary load control options, rate
structures with financial incentives, rebates, or other incentives that offset the cost of purchasing or installing electric vehicle charging equipment for users who elect nonpeak rate structures. Before approving such pilot programs,
including special rates, contracts, and incentives, the Commission shall ensure that such action meets the provisions of subsection B of § 56-235.2 of the Code of Virginia and that such actions are necessary in order to acquire information
which is or may be in furtherance of the public interest. An electric utility that participates in such an approved pilot program shall be entitled to recover annually the costs of its participation in any such pilot program conducted
by the utility on or after January 1, 2011.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 20, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any applications pending with the State Corporation Commission regarding new underground facilities or offshore wind facilities on or after January 1, 2018.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 24, provides: “That this act shall be known as the Grid Transformation and Security Act.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 145 C 12 h 1, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “For the purposes of § 56-232, Code of Virginia, ‘Contracts of Telephone Companies with State Government’ and
for the purposes of § 56-234 ‘Contracts for Service Rendered by a Telephone Company for the State Government’ shall be deemed to include communications lines into public schools which are used for educational technology. The rate structure
for such lines shall be negotiated by the Superintendent of Public Instruction and the Chief Information Officer of the Virginia Information Technologies Agency. Further, the Superintendent and Director are authorized to encourage
the development of ‘by-pass’ infrastructure in localities where it fails to obtain competitive prices or prices consistent with the best rates obtained in other parts of the state.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 833 substituted “nothing contained herein or in § 56-481.1 shall apply to (i) schedules of rates for any telecommunications service provided to the public by virtue of any contract with, (ii) for any service provided under or
relating to a contract for telecommunications services with, or (iii) contracts for service rendered by any telephone company to, the state government or any agency thereof” for “nothing herein contained shall be construed as applicable
to schedules of rates or contracts for service rendered by any telephone company to, the state government” in the next-to-last sentence.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 738 and 740 are identical, and inserted subsection designations; inserted the second sentence in the introductory paragraph of subsection A; added subdivisions A 1 and A 2 and subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 296 added the third sentence in subsection B. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For note on public utility service charges, see 49 Va. L. Rev. 1161 (1963).

For article on siting electric power facilities, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 257 (1972.) For article analyzing ratemaking issues under the SCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 601 (1973).

For special section on ratemaking and public policy in Virginia, see 18 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 73 (1976).

For note on payment of costs of cancelled utility project, see 43 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1499 (1986).

For article on developments in the field of Virginia public utility law from June 2002 through May 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 195 (2003).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
6B M.J. Electricity, §§ 3, 5; 9A M.J. Gas Companies, § 8; 15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, §§ 18, 22, 28.

§ 56-234.1.
Liability to customer for violation of duty to determine and charge lowest rate applicable.

It shall be the duty of every public utility, upon written request by the customer, to determine the lowest rate applicable, provided that such public utility shall not be required to make such a determination for any single customer more frequently than
annually. If the rate charged thereafter is not such lowest rate applicable, such public utility shall be liable to the customer for the amount of the difference between the amount paid by the customer and the amount that would have
been paid if the customer had been charged the lowest rate applicable from and after the customer’s request; provided that the public utility may require and rely on written information from the customer relating to the customer’s
expected demand for and use of the utility service where such information is relevant to the determination required hereunder. Where a contract for a specified period of time is lawfully required by the public utility, the rates prescribed
by such contract shall be lawful during the term of such contract so long as they are the lowest applicable to the conditions of service specified in the contract, unless the actual conditions of service require the application of
a higher rate. This section shall not be applicable to rates charged by any public utility prior to July 1, 1970.

History.
1970, c. 258.

§ 56-234.2.
Review of rates.

The Commission shall review the rates of any public utility on an annual basis when, in the opinion of the Commission, such annual review is in the public interest, provided that the rates of a public utility subject to § 56-585.1 shall be reviewed in
accordance with subsection A of that section.

History.
1972, c. 537; 2007, cc. 888, 933.

Cross references.

As to natural gas conservation and ratemaking efficiency plans, see § 56-602.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 888 and 933 are identical, and added the proviso to the end.

Law Review.

For article on the evolution of the State Corporation Commission, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 523 (1973).

For article analyzing ratemaking issues under the SCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 601 (1973).

§ 56-234.3.
Approval of expenditures for and monitoring of new generation facilities and projected operation programs of electric utilities.

Prior to construction or financial commitments therefor, any electric utility subject to the jurisdiction of the State Corporation Commission intending to construct any new generation facility capable of producing 100 megawatts or more of electric energy
shall submit to the State Corporation Commission a petition setting forth the nature of the proposed construction and the necessity therefor in relation to its projected forecast of programs of operation. Such petition shall include
(i) the utility’s preliminary construction plans, (ii) the methods by which the work will be contracted, by competitive bid or otherwise, (iii) the names and addresses of the contractors and subcontractors, when known, proposed to
do such work, and (iv) the plan by which the public utility will monitor such construction to ensure that the work will be done in a proper, expeditious and efficient manner. The Commission, upon receipt of the petition, shall order
that a public hearing be held to assist it in accumulating as much relevant data as possible in reaching its determination for the necessity of the proposed generation facility. The Commission shall review the petition, consider the
testimony given at the public hearing, and determine whether the proposed improvements are necessary to enable the public utility to furnish reasonably adequate service and facilities at reasonable and just rates. After making its
determination, the Commission shall enter an order within nine months after the filing of such petition either approving or disapproving the proposed expenditure. Upon approval, the Commission shall set forth in its order terms and
conditions it deems necessary for the efficient and proper construction of the generation facility.

Every electric utility capable of producing 100 megawatts or more of electric energy shall file with the Commission a projected forecast of its programs of operation, on such terms and for such time periods as directed by the Commission. Such a forecast
shall include, but not be limited to, the anticipated required capacity to fulfill the requirements of the forecast, how the utility will achieve such capacity, the financial requirements for the period covered, the anticipated sources
of those financial requirements, the research and development procedures, where appropriate, of new energy sources, and the budget for the research and development program.

In addition, the Commission shall investigate and monitor the major construction projects of any public utility to assure that such projects are being conducted in an economical, expeditious, and efficient manner.

Whenever uneconomical, inefficient or wasteful practices, procedures, designs or planning are found to exist, the Commission shall have the authority to employ, at the sole expense of the utility, qualified persons, answerable solely to the Commission,
who shall audit and investigate such practices, procedures, designs or planning and recommend to the Commission measures necessary to correct or eliminate such practices, procedures, designs or planning.

Consistent with § 56-235.3, any public utility, electric or otherwise, seeking to pass through the cost of any capital project to its customers, shall have the burden of proving that such cost was incurred through reasonable, proper and efficient practices,
and to the extent that such public utility fails to bear such burden of proof, such costs shall not be passed on to its customers in its rate base.

The Commission shall have the authority to approve, disapprove, or alter the utility’s program in a manner consistent with the best interest of the citizens of the Commonwealth. The petitioning or filing public utility may appeal the decision of the Commission
to the Supreme Court of Virginia.

History.
1976, c. 701; 1977, c. 261; 1978, c. 700; 1984, cc. 453, 454; 1997, c. 138.

The 1997 amendment,
in the first sentence of the second paragraph, deleted “annually” preceding “file with the Commission,” deleted “five and ten year” preceding “projected forecast,” and inserted “on such terms and for such time periods as
directed by the Commission” following “programs of operation.”

Law Review.

For discussion of the powers of the SCC under this section in the survey of Virginia administrative law for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1360 (1976).

for year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1365 (1978).

For note on payment of costs of cancelled utility project, see 43 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1499 (1986).

§ 56-234.4.
Authority to investigate utility operations to determine efficiency.

The Commission shall have the authority to investigate public utilities for the purpose of determining efficiency and economy of operations.

History.
1977, c. 261.

§ 56-234.5.
Required disclosure by certain officers and directors of certain utilities.

If it comes to the attention of any elected officer or director of a public utility, as defined in § 56-232, that such public utility has, during the preceding calendar year, let a construction, engineering or equipment contract, including any subcontract,
of a value in excess of $750,000 to a contractor or subcontractor in which such officer or director, or the spouse of such officer or director living in the same household, owns stocks or bonds or an equity interest, constituting more
than five percent of the ownership of such contractor or subcontractor or valued at more than $50,000, whichever is less, such officer or director shall file with the Commission, by April 30 of each year, a list of every such contractor
or subcontractor. This requirement shall only apply to the elected officer or director of a public utility that has its rates, tolls, charges, or schedules set by the Commission based on the public utility’s cost of providing service.

History.
1979, c. 9; 2010, c. 581.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 581 added the last sentence.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on administrative law and utility regulation for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1980).

§ 56-235.
When Commission may fix rates, schedules, etc.; conformance with chapter.

If upon investigation the rates, tolls, charges, schedules, or joint rates of any public utility operating in this Commonwealth shall be found to be unjust, unreasonable, insufficient or unjustly discriminatory or to be preferential or otherwise in violation
of any of the provisions of law, the State Corporation Commission shall have power to fix and order substituted therefor such rate or rates, tolls, charges or schedules as shall be just and reasonable. All rates, tolls, charges or
schedules set by the Commission shall be valid only if they are in full conformance with the provisions of this chapter.

History.
Code 1919, § 4071; 1977, c. 336.

Cross references.

As to how changes in rates effected, see § 56-237.

As to power of Commission to change regulations, measurements, practices, services or acts, see § 56-247.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on business associations for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1541 (1971).

For special section on ratemaking and public policy in Virginia, see 18 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 73 (1976).

For survey of Virginia corporation law for the year 1976-77, see 63 Va. L. Rev. 1361 (1977).

For note on payment of costs of cancelled utility project, see 43 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1499 (1986).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
6B M.J. Drains, Sewers and Drainage Districts, § 7; 9A M.J. Gas Companies, § 8; 15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, §§ 2, 22, 23, 28.

§ 56-235.1.
Conservation of energy and capital resources.

It shall be the duty of the Commission to investigate from time to time the acts, practices, rates or charges of public utilities so as to determine whether such acts, practices, rates or charges are reasonably calculated to promote the maximum effective
conservation and use of energy and capital resources used by public utilities in rendering utility service. Where the Commission finds that the public interest would be served, it may order any public utility to eliminate, alter or
adopt a substitute for any act, practice, rate or charge which is not reasonably calculated to promote the maximum effective conservation and use of energy and capital resources used by public utilities in providing utility service
and it may further provide for the dissemination of information to the public, either through the Commission staff or through a public utility, in order to promote public understanding and cooperation in achieving effective conservation
of such resources; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the adoption of any rate or charge which is clearly not cost-based or which is in the nature of a penalty for otherwise permissible
use of utility services. This section shall not apply to telephone companies.

History.
1976, c. 379; 2011, cc. 738, 740.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 738 and 740 are identical, and added the last sentence.

Law Review.

For discussion of this section in the survey of Virginia administrative law for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1360 (1976).

§ 56-235.1:1.
Rates for stand-by electric service at renewable cogeneration facilities.

The Commission shall adopt regulations pursuant to its rules of practice and procedure that require an electric utility to provide a rate for stand-by service to customers that operate a cogeneration facility in the Commonwealth that generates renewable
energy, as defined in § 56-576. Such regulations shall allow the electric utility to recover all of the costs that are identified by the electric utility and determined by the Commission to be related to the provision of the stand-by
service, including but not limited to the costs of transformers and other equipment required to provide stand-by service and the costs of capacity and generation, including but not limited to fuel costs.

Within 90 days following the effective date of the regulations adopted pursuant to subsection A, each public utility providing electric service in the Commonwealth shall submit a plan setting forth how the utility will comply with the regulations if it
does not already have stand-by provisions approved by the Commission that comply with the regulations. The Commission shall, after notice and the opportunity for hearing, determine whether a utility’s plan complies with the regulations.

History.
2009, c. 745.

§ 56-235.1:2.
Costs of using small, women-owned, or minority-owned businesses.

In any proceeding under this title in which the Commission is required to determine whether costs incurred by a public utility in its delivery or provision of any goods or service are reasonable or prudent, the incremental portion of the costs incurred
as a result of the public utility’s contracting with a small, woman-owned, or minority-owned business to deliver or provide the goods or service rather than contracting with a business that could have delivered or provided the goods
or service at lower costs shall not be found to be unreasonable or imprudently incurred, provided that the costs of the delivery or provision of the goods or services by the small, woman-owned, or minority-owned business do not exceed,
by more than three percent, the costs thereof that would have been incurred had the public utility contracted with the lowest-cost qualified business. As used in this section, “small, woman-owned, or minority-owned business” means
a business that is certified by the Department of Small Business and Supplier Diversity as a small, women-owned, or minority-owned business pursuant to the conditions and provisions in §

2.2-1604

.

History.
2020, c. 744.

§ 56-235.2.
All rates, tolls, etc., to be just and reasonable to jurisdictional customers; findings and conclusions to be set forth; alternative forms of regulation for electric companies.

Any rate, toll, charge or schedule of any public utility operating in this Commonwealth shall be considered to be just and reasonable only if: (1) the public utility has demonstrated that such rates, tolls, charges or schedules in the aggregate provide
revenues not in excess of the aggregate actual costs incurred by the public utility in serving customers within the jurisdiction of the Commission, including such normalization for nonrecurring costs and annualized adjustments
for future costs as the Commission finds reasonably can be predicted to occur during the rate year, and a fair return on the public utility’s rate base used to serve those jurisdictional customers, which return shall be calculated
in accordance with § 56-585.1 for utilities subject to such section; (1a) the investor-owned public electric utility has demonstrated that no part of such rates, tolls, charges or schedules includes costs for advertisement, except
for advertisements either required by law or rule or regulation, or for advertisements which solely promote the public interest, conservation or more efficient use of energy; and (2) the public utility has demonstrated that such
rates, tolls, charges or schedules contain reasonable classifications of customers. Notwithstanding § 56-234, the Commission may approve, either in the context of or apart from a rate proceeding after notice to all affected parties
and hearing, special rates, contracts or incentives to individual customers or classes of customers where it finds such measures are in the public interest. Such special charges shall not be limited by the provisions of § 56-235.4.
In determining costs of service, the Commission may use the test year method of estimating revenue needs. In any Commission order establishing a fair and reasonable rate of return for an investor-owned gas, telephone or electric
public utility, the Commission shall set forth the findings of fact and conclusions of law upon which such order is based.

For ratemaking purposes, the Commission shall determine the federal and state income tax costs for investor-owned water, gas, or electric utility that is part of a publicly-traded, consolidated group as follows: (i) such utility’s apportioned state income
tax costs shall be calculated according to the applicable statutory rate, as if the utility had not filed a consolidated return with its affiliates, and (ii) such utility’s federal income tax costs shall be calculated according
to the applicable federal income tax rate and shall exclude any consolidated tax liability or benefit adjustments originating from any taxable income or loss of its affiliates.

In any ratemaking proceeding for an investor-owned utility authorized to furnish water or water and sewer service initiated after January 1, 2022, the Commission shall evaluate such utility on a stand-alone basis and, for purposes of establishing any
revenue requirement and rates, utilize such utility’s actual end-of-test period capital structure and cost of capital without regard to the cost of capital, capital structure, or investments of any other entities with which
such utility may be affiliated, unless the Commission finds based on evidence in the record that the debt to equity ratio of the actual end-of-test period capital structure of such utility is unreasonable, in which case the
Commission may utilize a debt to equity ratio that it finds to be reasonable. In all proceedings initiated after January 1, 2022, in which the Commission reviews the rates and associated earnings of an investor-owned utility
authorized to furnish water or water and sewer service, the Commission shall conduct such review utilizing the same cost of capital and capital structure adopted in the utility’s most recent rate case in which such rates were
set, without regard to any later changes in the cost of capital or capital structure.

The Commission shall, before approving special rates, contracts, incentives or other alternative regulatory plans under subsection A, ensure that such action (i) protects the public interest, (ii) will not unreasonably prejudice or disadvantage any customer
or class of customers, and (iii) will not jeopardize the continuation of reliable electric service.

After notice and public hearing, the Commission shall issue guidelines for special rates adopted pursuant to subsection A that will ensure that other customers are not caused to bear increased rates as a result of such special rates.

History.
1977, c. 336; 1984, c. 312; 1996, c. 156; 2007, cc. 537, 888, 933; 2022, cc. 581, 582.

Cross references.

As to the Natural Gas Conservation and Ratemaking Efficiency Act, see § 56-600 et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, c. 408, cl. 2, provides: “That public utilities in the Commonwealth shall (i) evaluate options to develop and offer off-peak charging rates or other incentives to encourage owners of an electric vehicle to charge or recharge its battery during
nonpeak times, when practical, and (ii) file copies of such evaluations with the State Corporation Commission. The State Corporation Commission shall make copies of the evaluations available to the public.”

Acts 2011, c. 408, cl. 3, provides: “That the State Corporation Commission (the Commission) shall, notwithstanding § 56-234 of the Code of Virginia, be authorized to approve, after notice to all affected parties and opportunity for hearing, pilot programs
conducted by public utilities, including programs offering special rates, contracts, or incentives to individual customers or classes of customers to determine the feasibility, and the implications for the public interest, of allowing
public electric utilities to offer time-differentiated rates to users of electric motor vehicles to encourage charging of vehicles during nonpeak periods. Elements of the pilot programs may include voluntary load control options, rate
structures with financial incentives, rebates, or other incentives that offset the cost of purchasing or installing electric vehicle charging equipment for users who elect nonpeak rate structures. Before approving such pilot programs,
including special rates, contracts, and incentives, the Commission shall ensure that such action meets the provisions of subsection B of § 56-235.2 of the Code of Virginia and that such actions are necessary in order to acquire information
which is or may be in furtherance of the public interest. An electric utility that participates in such an approved pilot program shall be entitled to recover annually the costs of its participation in any such pilot program conducted
by the utility on or after January 1, 2011.”

The 1996 amendment
inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph, added the present second and third sentences in subsection A, and added subsections B, C, and D.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 537 added the last paragraph in subsection A.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 888 and 933 are identical, and in subsection A, in clause (1) of the first sentence, substituted “including” for “subject to,” “annualized adjustments for future costs” for “adjustments for known future increases in costs” and
“finds reasonably can be predicted to occur during the rate year” for “may deem reasonable” and inserted “which return shall be . . . to such section” at the end and deleted “but shall not consider any adjustments or expenses that
are speculative or cannot be predicted with reasonable certainty” from the end of the fourth sentence; deleted former subsection B, pertaining to alternative forms of regulation; redesignated former subsections C and D as subsections
B and C; and substituted “subsection A” for “subsections A and B” in subsection B.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 581 and 582 are identical, and added the third paragraph of subsection A.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia corporation law for the year 1976-77, see 63 Va. L. Rev. 1361 (1977).

For an article, “Public Utility Law,” see 31 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1173 (1997).

For article, “Public Utility Law,” see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 295 (2008).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
9A M.J. Gas Companies, § 8.

§ 56-235.3.
Procedures for investigation of rate applications.

At any hearing on the application of a public utility for a change in a rate, toll, charge or schedule, the burden of proof to show that the proposed change is just and reasonable, shall be upon the public utility. The Commission shall be authorized to
prescribe all necessary rules and regulations for the conduct of such hearings which shall provide for full and fair participation in such hearings by any interested person subject to such guidelines as the Commission may deem appropriate.
Upon the conclusion of such hearings, the Commission shall issue an order and such opinion as is necessary to set forth fully the Commission’s findings of fact and conclusions of law. Copies of the transcripts of public hearings held
to establish a fair rate of return and changes in rates, tolls and charges for investor-owned public utilities involving significant public interest shall be placed in no less than one location nor more than three locations in the
geographic area served by the utility. The Commission shall determine which proceedings are of sufficient interest to require the placing of such transcripts and the location or locations to be used; provided, however, that proceedings
involving investor-owned utilities serving 25,000 or more customers shall be deemed to be of sufficient public interest.

History.
1977, c. 336.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia corporation law for the year 1976-77, see 63 Va. L. Rev. 1361 (1977).

§ 56-235.4.
Prohibition of multiple rate increases within any twelve-month period; exception.

The regulated operating revenues of a public utility shall not be increased pursuant to Chapter 9.1 (§ 56-231.15 et seq.), 10 (§ 56-232 et seq.) or 19 (§ 56-531 et seq.) of this title more than once within any twelve-month period. This limitation shall
not apply to increases in regulated operating revenues resulting from (i) increases in rates pursuant to § 56-245 or § 56-249.6, (ii) any automatic rate adjustment clause approved by the Commission, (iii) new rate schedules for
service not offered under existing rate schedules or for expansion, reduction, or termination of existing services, (iv) initiation, modification or termination of experimental rates under § 56-234, or (v) the making permanent
of an experimental program. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, a telephone company may apply to the Commission to pass on to its customers as a part of its rates any changes approved by the Commission in the
carrier access charges.

The Commission may adopt such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. The Commission may specify, by rule, the time during the calendar year when application may be filed by electric utility and cooperatives,
gas utilities, telephone utilities and cooperatives, and other utilities.The Commission may by rule provide standards and procedures for expedited handling of rate increase applications, and such rules may provide that an expedited
rate increase may take effect in less than twelve months after the preceding increase so long as regulated operating revenues are not increased pursuant to the provisions of subsection A of this section more than once in any calendar
year.

History.
1984, c. 725; 1989, c. 666; 1990, c. 787; 1995, c. 382; 1997, c. 707; 2000, c. 994.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, cc. 1 and 2, cl. 2 provides: “That an incumbent electric utility that was, as of July 1, 1999, not bound by a rate case settlement adopted by the State Corporation Commission that extended in its application beyond January 1, 2002, shall suspend
the collection of interim rates during the pendency of the Commission’s consideration of the utility’s application brought pursuant to subsection A of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia and filed on July 15, 2009. To determine if a
refund is required for the period when interim rates were in effect before such suspension, the Commission shall offset any required refund, which is the amount of revenue collected while the interim rates were in effect that exceeds
the amount approved by the Commission in its final order on the utility’s application, by the amount of revenue that the utility would have collected had the rates ultimately approved by the Commission in its final order on the utility’s
application been in effect during the period between the date such suspension commenced and the effective date of the rates approved by the Commission in its final order. The Commission shall issue its final order on the utility’s
application not later than July 15, 2010, for rates to become effective for bills rendered on and after August 1, 2010, notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A of § 56-235.4 of the Code of Virginia.”

The 1995 amendment,
in subsection A, in the first sentence, deleted “or” following “§ 56-249.6”, inserted “or” following “the Commission”, and added clause (iii).

The 1997 amendment,
in the second sentence of subsection A, inserted “or for expansion, reduction, or termination of existing services” at the end of clause (iii) and added clauses (iv) and (v).

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 994 rewrote the first sentence of subsection A.